California statutes. Education Code
(e) For school districts electing to compute units of average daily attendance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.5, the amount computed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) shall be added to the amount computed in subdivision (c) or (d), as
 appropriate.

(f) For the 1984–85 fiscal year only, the county superintendent of schools shall reduce the total revenue limit computed in this section by the amount of the decreased employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System resulting from enactment of Chapter 330 of the Statutes of 1982, offset by any increase in those contributions, as of the 1983–84 fiscal year, resulting from subsequent changes in employer contribution rates.

(g) The reduction required by subdivision (f) shall be calculated as follows:

(1) Determine the amount of employer contributions that would have been made in the 1983–84 fiscal year if the applicable Public Employees’ Retirement System employer contribution rate
 in effect immediately before the enactment of Chapter 330 of the Statutes of 1982 was in effect during the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(2) Subtract from the amount determined in paragraph (1) the greater of subparagraph (A) or (B):

(A) The amount of employer contributions that would have been made in the 1983–84 fiscal year if the applicable Public Employees’ Retirement System employer contribution rate in effect immediately after the enactment of Chapter 330 of the Statutes of 1982 was in effect during the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(B) The actual amount of employer contributions made to the Public Employees’ Retirement System in the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System for
 either of the following shall be excluded from the calculation specified above:

(A) Positions supported totally by federal funds that were subject to supplanting restrictions.

(B) Positions supported, to the extent of employer contributions not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) by a single educational agency, from a revenue source determined on the basis of equity to be properly excludable from the provisions of this subdivision by the Superintendent with the approval of the Director of Finance.

(4) For accounting purposes, the reduction made by this subdivision may be reflected as an expenditure from appropriate sources of revenue as directed by the Superintendent.

(h) The Superintendent shall apportion to each school district the amount
 determined in this section less the sum of:

(1) The school district’s property tax revenue received pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16140) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(4) Prior years’ taxes and taxes on the unsecured roll.

(5) Fifty percent of the amount received pursuant to Section 41603.

(6) (A) The amount, if any, received pursuant to the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code), except for any amount received pursuant to Section 33401 or 33676 of the Health and Safety Code that is used for land acquisition, facility construction, facility reconstruction, facility remodeling, maintenance, or deferred maintenance, and except for any amount received pursuant to Section 33492.15 of, paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 33607.5 of, or Section 33607.7 of, the Health and Safety Code that is allocated exclusively for educational facilities.

(B) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Sections 34177, 34179.5, 34179.6, and 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) The amount, if any, received pursuant to
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(7) For a unified school district, other than a unified school district that has converted all of its schools to charter status pursuant to Section 47606, the amount of statewide average general-purpose funding per unit of average daily attendance received by school districts for each of four grade level ranges, as computed by the department pursuant to Section 47633, multiplied by the average daily attendance, in corresponding grade level ranges, of any pupils who attend charter schools funded pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 47630) of Part 26.8 of Division 4 for which the school district is the sponsoring local educational agency, as defined in Section 47632, and who reside in and would otherwise have been eligible to attend a noncharter school of the school district.

(i) A transfer of pupils of grades 7 and 8 between an elementary school district and a high school district shall not result in the receiving school district receiving a revenue limit apportionment for those pupils that exceeds 105 percent of the statewide average revenue limit for the type and size of the receiving school district.

(j) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, this section shall be used only for purposes of allocating revenues received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(k) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 32.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Inoperative July 1, 2033.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.01.

For purposes of Section 42238.02, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) (1) “Eligible for free or reduced-price meals” means determined to meet federal income eligibility criteria, either through completing an application for the federal National School Lunch Program, through a federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) - compliant Universal Benefit Application, or through an alternative household income data collection form, or deemed to be categorically eligible for free or reduced-price meals under the federal National School
 Lunch Program, as described in Part 245 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) (A) A school participating in a special assistance alternative authorized by Section 11(a)(1) of the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (Public Law 113-79), including Provision 2, Provision 3, or the Community Eligibility Provision, may establish a base year for purposes of the local control funding formula by doing either of the following:

(i) Determining the pupils at the school who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals and using each pupil’s eligibility status in that base year to report eligibility for up to each of the following three school years.

(ii) Carrying forward eligibility for pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals from the school year in which the school
 applied to use a federal universal school meal provision, and using each pupil’s eligibility status from the application year to report eligibility for up to each of the following three school years.

(B) The school may include between base year eligibility determinations, any current or newly enrolled pupils who are determined to be eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(3) A school that uses the special assistance alternative shall maintain information on each pupil’s eligibility status and annually submit information on that status in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02 or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 2574, as applicable.

(4) For a pupil who transfers to a school using a special assistance
 alternative and who is transferring between schools within the same school district, documentation supporting eligibility for that pupil for purposes of the local control funding formula may be transferred from the pupil’s old school to the pupil’s new school, as long as the documentation supporting eligibility for that pupil is less than four years old and is updated at least once every four years.

(5) To the extent permitted by federal law, a school may choose to establish a new base year for purposes of the federal National School Lunch Program at the same time the school establishes a new base year for purposes of the local control funding formula. A school may use federal National School Lunch Program application forms to collect household income data as permitted under the federal National School Lunch Program. If the use of federal National School Lunch Program application forms is not permitted, a school shall use alternative household
 income data collection forms.

(6) An alternative household income data collection form shall be confidential and shall not be shared by the school other than as necessary for purposes of determining funding allocations under the local control funding formula and for assessing the accountability of that funding. An alternative household income data collection form shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(A) Information sufficient to identify the pupil or pupils.

(B) Information sufficient to determine that the pupil or household meets federal income eligibility criteria sufficient to qualify for either a free or reduced-priced meal under the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (Public Law 113-79).

(C) Certification
 that the information is true and correct by the pupil’s adult household member.

(7) Paragraphs (2) and (4) are effective commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year.

(b) “Foster youth” means any of the following:

(1) A child who is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, whether or not the child has been removed from the child’s home by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 319 or 361 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A child who is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, has been removed from the child’s home by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 727 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and is in foster care as defined by subdivision
 (d) of Section 727.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) A nonminor under the transition jurisdiction of the juvenile court, as described in Section 450 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who satisfies all of the following criteria:

(A) The nonminor has attained 18 years of age while under an order of foster care placement by the juvenile court, and is not more than 19 years of age on or after January 1, 2012, not more than 20 years of age on or after January 1, 2013, and not more than 21 years of age, on or after January 1, 2014, and as described in Section 10103.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) The nonminor is in foster care under the placement and care responsibility of the county welfare department, county probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that
 entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) The nonminor is participating in a transitional independent living case plan pursuant to Section 475(8) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 675), as contained in the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351), as described in Section 11403 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) A dependent child of the court of an Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization who is the subject of a petition filed in the tribal court pursuant to the tribal court’s jurisdiction in accordance with the tribe’s law.

(5) A child who is the subject of a voluntary placement agreement, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 11400 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code.

(c) “Pupils of limited English proficiency” means pupils who do not have the clearly developed English language skills of comprehension, speaking, reading, and writing necessary to receive instruction only in English at a level substantially equivalent to pupils of the same age or grade whose primary language is English. “English learner” shall have the same meaning as provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 306 and as “pupils of limited English proficiency.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 27.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.015.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) According to 2023 findings from the Economic Policy Institute (EPI), inflation-adjusted average weekly wages of teachers have been relatively flat since 1996, finding that the average weekly wages of public school teachers (adjusted only for inflation) increased just twenty-nine dollars ($29) from 1996 to 2021, from one thousand three hundred nineteen dollars ($1,319) to one thousand three hundred forty-eight dollars ($1,348) (in 2021 dollars), where, in contrast, inflation-adjusted weekly wages of other college graduates rose from one thousand five hundred sixty-four dollars ($1,564) to two thousand nine dollars ($2,009) over the same period — a four hundred forty-five-dollar ($445) increase.

(2) The EPI also found that the teacher wage penalty, when comparing wages of teachers to other professions with similar educational and certification requirements, grew to a record high in 2021 at 23.5 percent nationally and 17.6 percent in California, up from 6.1 percent in 1996.

(3) Even when taking other benefits into account, the teacher total compensation penalty grew by 11.5 percentage points from 1993 to 2021.

(4) When Proposition 98 was approved by voters in 1988, it set as a target for school spending per pupil to “equal or exceed the average annual expenditure per student of the 10 states with the highest annual expenditures per student for elementary and high schools.” This target is embedded in Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to establish a public education transparency and accountability lens to better inform the Members of the Legislature as to the impacts of the state budget on the pay and benefits of the education workforce by reporting salary and benefits data of certificated and classified employees and the impacts on the professional respect and competitiveness of pay and benefits for classified and certificated employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.016.

(a) The department shall, on or before July 1, 2026, create a data collection system for salary and benefits data for represented certificated and classified nonmanagement employees. The data collected shall include salary, benefits, and full-time equivalent employee counts for certificated employees and for employees in the following classified bargaining unit classifications, which shall be collected in the same manner as for certificated employees, as determined by the department:

(1) Entry level schoolsite secretary or administrative assistant.

(2) Entry level central office secretary or administrative assistant.

(3) Entry
 level custodian.

(4) Entry level bus driver.

(5) Entry level food service worker.

(6) Entry level special education instructional aide.

(7) Entry level general education instructional aide.

(b) (1) On or before August 31, 2026, and on or before July 1 annually thereafter, school districts, county offices of education, and direct-funded charter schools as described in Section 47651 shall complete the data collection process created pursuant to subdivision
 (a) and report the data to the department. A school district or county office of education that is the chartering authority or designated oversight agency of a locally funded charter school as described in Section 47651 shall complete and report the data to the department for the locally funded charter school.

(2) (A) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department shall make the data for the immediate prior fiscal year submitted by school districts, county offices of education, and direct-funded charter schools pursuant to this section publicly available in a downloadable open file data format by February 26, 2027.

(B) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, the department shall make the data for the immediate prior fiscal year submitted by school districts, county offices of
 education, and direct-funded charter schools publicly available in a downloadable open file data format pursuant to this section by December 31 of each year.

(c) On or before January 31, 2027, and on or before November 30 annually thereafter, the department shall report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the progress of school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools in increasing salaries for classified employees and certificated employees. This report shall include the following:

(1) The change in salary rates for certificated employees as compared to the last 10 fiscal years or, if the data has been filed for fewer than 10 fiscal years, whichever year the data was filed for first.

(2) The change in salary rates for classified
 employees as compared to the last 10 fiscal years or, if the data has been filed for fewer than 10 fiscal years, whichever year the data was filed for first.

(3) The salary rate changes year over year.

(4) The rate of salary change compared to the rate of yearly inflation as measured by the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year.

(5) The rate of total compensation changes year over year.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Classified bargaining unit classification” does not include, for purposes of determining employees in that classification, confidential employees as defined in Section 3540.1 of the Government Code.

(2) “Full-time equivalent” means, for classified employees, the total number of full-time equivalent employees in the local educational agency, with the number of full-time equivalent employees in each classified bargaining unit classification computed as the sum of both of the following:

(A) The sum of the full-time equivalent of employees who work full-time hours in each work day, as defined by the local educational agency, in that classification. Each of these employees shall count as 1.0 full-time equivalent.

(B) The sum of the full-time equivalent of
 employees who work less than full-time hours in each work day, as defined by the local educational agency, in that classification. The full-time equivalent of these employees shall be calculated by dividing the number of hours each employee works each day in that classification by the number of full-time hours.

(3) “Salary” means the hourly wage paid for work by classified employees or the annual wage paid for work by certificated employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 744, Sec. 3.   (SB 147)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.017.

In any fiscal year, if a decline in Education Protection Account revenue results in a nontransfer of funds into the Education Protection Account fourth-quarter payment, the Superintendent shall recover a local educational agency’s overpayment of Education Protection Account funds from the current year’s second principal apportionment payment made pursuant to Section 14041 for deposit into the Education Protection Account. The fourth-quarter Education Protection Account payment for the current fiscal year shall be made by the Controller as soon as practical, but no later than August 15 of the subsequent fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 29.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.02.

(a) The amount computed pursuant to this section shall be known as the school district and charter school local control funding formula.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section “unduplicated pupil” means a pupil enrolled in a school district or a charter school who is either classified as an English learner, eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, or is a foster youth. A pupil shall be counted only once for purposes of this section if any of the following apply:

(A) The pupil is classified as an English learner and is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal.

(B) The pupil is classified as an English learner
 and is a foster youth.

(C) The pupil is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal and is classified as a foster youth.

(D) The pupil is classified as an English learner, is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, and is a foster youth.

(2) Under procedures and timeframes established by the Superintendent, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a school district or charter school shall annually submit its enrolled free and reduced-price meal eligibility, foster youth, and English learner pupil-level records for enrolled pupils to the Superintendent using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(3) (A) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a county office of education shall review and validate certified
 aggregate English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil data for school districts and charter schools under its jurisdiction to ensure the data is reported accurately. The Superintendent shall provide each county office of education with appropriate access to school district and charter school data reports in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for purposes of ensuring data reporting accuracy.

(B) The Controller shall include the instructions necessary to enforce paragraph (2) in the audit guide required by Section 14502.1. The instructions shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, procedures for determining if the English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil counts are consistent with the school district’s or charter school’s English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil records.

(4) The Superintendent shall make the calculations pursuant to this section using the data submitted by local educational agencies, including charter schools, through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. Under timeframes and procedures established by the Superintendent, school districts and charter schools may review and revise their submitted data on English learner, foster youth, and free or reduced-price meal eligible pupil counts to ensure the accuracy of data reflected in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(5) The Superintendent shall annually compute the percentage of unduplicated pupils for each school district and charter school by dividing the enrollment of unduplicated pupils in a school district or charter school by the total enrollment in that school district or charter school pursuant to all of the following:

(A) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, divide the sum of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 fiscal year by the sum of the total pupil enrollment for the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(B) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, divide the sum of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years by the sum of the total pupil enrollment for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years.

(C) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, divide the sum of unduplicated pupils for the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years by the sum of the total pupil enrollment for the current fiscal year and the two prior fiscal years.

(D) (i) For purposes of the quotients determined pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C), the Superintendent shall use
 a school district’s or charter school’s enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2014–15 fiscal year instead of the enrollment of unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in the 2013–14 fiscal year if doing so would yield an overall greater percentage of unduplicated pupils.

(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature to review each school district and charter school’s enrollment of unduplicated pupils for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 fiscal years and provide one-time funding, if necessary, for a school district or charter school with higher enrollment of unduplicated pupils in the 2014–15 fiscal year as compared to the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(E) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of subparagraph (C), the unduplicated pupils and total pupil enrollment in prior fiscal years shall be the following:

(I) For a transferred charter school, the counts shall be equal to the counts reported for the original charter school.

(II) For an acquiring charter school, the counts shall be equal to the counts reported for the original charter school. This subclause shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, unless its operation is extended by the Legislature.

(III) For the restructured portions of a divided charter school, the counts shall be zero.

(IV) For the remaining portion of a divided charter school, the counts shall be equal to the counts reported for the original charter school.

(ii) The definitions in Section 47654 apply for purposes of this subparagraph.

(6) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14002, the data used to determine the percentage of unduplicated pupils shall be final once that data is no longer used in the current fiscal year calculation of the percentage of unduplicated pupils. This paragraph does not apply to a change that is the result of an audit exception, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41341.

(c) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall annually calculate a local control funding formula grant for each school district and charter school in the state pursuant to this section.

(d) The Superintendent shall compute a grade span adjusted base grant equal to the total of the following amounts:

(1) For
 the 2013–14 fiscal year, a base grant of:

(A) Six thousand eight hundred forty-five dollars ($6,845) for average daily attendance in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(B) Six thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars ($6,947) for average daily attendance in grades 4 to 6, inclusive.

(C) Seven thousand one hundred fifty-four dollars ($7,154) for average daily attendance in grades 7 and 8.

(D) Eight thousand two hundred eighty-nine dollars ($8,289) for average daily attendance in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(2) In each year the grade span adjusted base grants in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted by the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for
 State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(3) (A) The Superintendent shall compute an additional adjustment to the kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, base grant as adjusted pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (5) equal to 10.4 percent. The additional grant shall be calculated by multiplying the kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, base grant, as adjusted by
 paragraphs (2) and (5), by 10.4 percent.

(B) Until paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 is effective, as a condition of the receipt of funds in this paragraph, a school district shall make progress toward maintaining an average class enrollment of not more than 24 pupils for each schoolsite in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, unless a collectively bargained alternative annual average class enrollment for each schoolsite in those grades is agreed to by the school district, pursuant to the following calculation:

(i) Determine a school district’s average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, in the prior year. For the 2013–14 fiscal year, this amount shall be the average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(ii) Determine a school district’s proportion of total need pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03.

(iii) Determine the percentage of the need calculated in clause (ii) that is met by funding provided to the school district pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03.

(iv) Determine the difference between the amount computed pursuant to clause (i) and an average class enrollment of not more than 24 pupils.

(v) Calculate a current year average class enrollment adjustment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, equal to the adjustment calculated in clause (iv) multiplied by the percentage determined pursuant to clause (iii).

(C) School districts that have an average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, of 24 pupils or less for each schoolsite in the 2012–13 fiscal year, shall be exempt from the requirements of subparagraph (B) so long as the school district continues to maintain an average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, of not more than 24 pupils, unless a collectively bargained alternative ratio is agreed to by the school district.

(D) (i) Upon full implementation of the local control funding formula, as a condition of the receipt of funds in this paragraph, all school districts shall maintain an average class enrollment for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, of not more than 24 pupils for each schoolsite in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, unless a collectively bargained alternative ratio is
 agreed to by the school district.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), for purposes of meeting the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 48000, a school district shall maintain an average transitional kindergarten class enrollment of not more than 24 pupils for each schoolsite.

(E) The average class enrollment requirement for each schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, established pursuant to this paragraph shall not be subject to waiver by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or by the Superintendent.

(F) The Controller shall include the instructions necessary to enforce this paragraph in the audit guide required by Section 14502.1. The instructions shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, procedures for determining if the average class enrollment for each
 schoolsite for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, exceeds 24 pupils, or an alternative average class enrollment for each schoolsite pursuant to a collectively bargained alternative ratio. The procedures for determining average class enrollment for each schoolsite shall include criteria for employing sampling.

(4) The Superintendent shall compute an additional adjustment to the base grant for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as adjusted pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (5), equal to 2.6 percent. The additional grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grant for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as adjusted by paragraphs (2) and (5) by 2.6 percent.

(5) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall increase the base grants for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, by 6.7 percent. This adjustment shall be calculated by multiplying the grade span-adjusted base grants
 calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) for the 2021–22 fiscal year by 6.7 percent. The adjustment shall be included in grade span-adjusted base grants amounts for purposes of the adjustment pursuant to paragraph (2) commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year.

(e) The Superintendent shall compute a supplemental grant add-on equal to 20 percent of the base grants as specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), for each school district’s or charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b). The supplemental grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grants as specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), by 20 percent and by the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to
 paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in that school district or charter school. The supplemental grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(f) (1) (A) The Superintendent shall compute a concentration grant add-on equal to 50 percent of the base grants as specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), for each school district’s or charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school district’s or charter school’s total enrollment. The concentration grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grants as specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision
 (d), by 50 percent and by the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the total enrollment in that school district or charter school.

(B) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, the concentration grant add-on referenced in subparagraph (A) shall instead be equal to 65 percent of the base grants as specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), for each school district’s or charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school district’s or charter school’s total enrollment. The concentration grant shall be calculated by multiplying the base grants as specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), as adjusted by paragraphs (2) to
 (5), inclusive, of subdivision (d), by 65 percent and by the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the total enrollment in that school district or charter school.

(2) (A) For a charter school physically located in only one school district, the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent used to calculate concentration grants shall not exceed the percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school district in which the charter school is physically located. For a charter school physically located in more than one school district, the charter school’s percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent used to calculate concentration grants
 shall not exceed that of the school district with the highest percentage of unduplicated pupils calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in excess of 55 percent of the school districts in which the charter school has a school facility. The concentration grant shall be expended in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 42238.03, a charter school shall report its physical location to the department under timeframes established by the department. For a charter school authorized by a school district, the department shall include the authorizing school district in the department’s determination of physical location. For a charter school authorized on appeal pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 47605, the department shall include the school district that initially denied the petition in the
 department’s determination of physical location. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14002, the reported physical location of the charter school shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year, and, for purposes of this paragraph, the percentage of unduplicated pupils of the school district associated with the charter school pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.

(g) (1) The Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to the amount of funding a school district or charter school received from funds allocated pursuant to the Targeted Instructional Improvement Block Grant program, as set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 41540) of Chapter 3.2, for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as that article
 read on January 1, 2013. A school district or charter school shall not receive a total funding amount from this add-on greater than the total amount of funding received by the school district or charter school from that program in the 2012–13 fiscal year. The amount computed pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect the reduction specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 42238.05, for the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2024–25 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on to
 the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to two thousand eight hundred thirteen dollars ($2,813) multiplied by the then current fiscal year’s second principal apportionment period average daily attendance in transitional kindergarten. Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, the add-on computed pursuant to this paragraph shall be adjusted by the percentage change applied pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). It is the intent of the Legislature that the costs to meet the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 48000 be supported by the add-on computed pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) Commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants